Vermont, session 2025-2026, H345.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 6701 is added to read:
§ 6701. GLITTER CONTAINING SYNTHETIC POLYMERS
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Glitter” means an assortment of flat, small, reflective particles that
are precision cut and come in a variety of shapes, sizes, and colors used for
decoration or ornamentation.
(2) “Intentionally added synthetic polymer microparticles” mean
synthetic polymer microplastics that a manufacturer has added to a product to
VT LEG #380463 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.345
2025 Page 2 of 3
confer a sought-after characteristic, in mixtures in a concentration equal to or
greater than one one-hundredth percent (0.01%) by weight.
(3)(A) “Synthetic polymer microparticles” mean polymers that are solid
and that fulfill both of the following conditions:
(i) the polymers are contained in particles and constitute at least
one percent by weight of those particles or build a continuous surface coating
on particles; and
(ii) at least one percent by weight of the particles fulfill either of
the following conditions:
(I) all dimensions of the particles are equal to or less than five
millimeters in size; or
(II) the length of the particles is equal to or less than 15
millimeters and each particle’s length is greater than three times the diameter.
(B) “Synthetic polymer microparticles” does not include polymers that
are the result of a polymerization process that has taken place in nature and not
as a result of human intervention, independently of the process through which
they have been extracted, which are not chemically modified substances.
(b)(1) Beginning on January 1, 2028, a person shall not sell, offer for sale,
or distribute into the commerce of the State any glitter containing intentionally
added synthetic polymer microparticles.
VT LEG #380463 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.345
2025 Page 3 of 3
(2) The prohibition under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall not
apply to glitter that is biodegradable, soluble, or natural and that does not
contain synthetic polymer microparticles.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380463 v.1